Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2581.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 6 TLSB 5582HV (3) 91 sb/js H.F. 2581 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 476.59 System enhancement 1 infrastructure. 2 1. It is the intent of the general assembly to authorize 3 alternative ratemaking mechanisms to develop and sustain 4 adequate water and wastewater treatment facilities within the 5 state to ensure resilient water supply and sanitation services 6 for Iowa consumers and provide economic benefits to the state. 7 The commission shall not be bound by traditional ratemaking 8 principles or traditional cost recovery mechanisms with respect 9 to system enhancement infrastructure. 10 2. For purposes of this section: 11 a. âBlanket-type work project orderâ means an agreement 12 between an eligible utility and a supplier to deliver goods or 13 services at a set price on a recurring basis over a specified 14 time period. 15 b. âEligible utilityâ means an investor-owned public 16 utility providing water or wastewater service subject to rate 17 regulation by the commission pursuant to section 476.1. 18 c. âPlanâ means a multiyear plan to implement system 19 enhancement improvements. 20 d. âRequirementâ means any decision or regulation imposed on 21 an eligible utility by a local government unit, a state, or the 22 federal government in connection with any of the following: 23 (1) The federal Water Pollution Control Act, 33 U.S.C. Â§1251 24 et seq. 25 (2) The federal Safe Drinking Water Act, 42 U.S.C. Â§300f et 26 seq. 27 (3) Any other law, order, or regulation administered by 28 the United States environmental protection agency, the United 29 States army corps of engineers, the United States department of 30 transportation, the Iowa department of transportation, or the 31 Iowa department of natural resources. 32 (4) Regulations imposed by a local government unit. 33 e. âSystem enhancement chargeâ means a charge assessed by an 34 eligible utility to recover system enhancement costs. 35 -1- LSB 5582HV (3) 91 sb/js 1/ 8 H.F. 2581 f. (1) âSystem enhancement costsâ means the following 1 costs associated with any of the following system enhancement 2 improvements: 3 (a) Depreciation expenses, including any such expenses 4 incurred prior to the approval of a plan containing the 5 applicable system enhancement improvement. 6 (b) Operation and maintenance expenses. 7 (c) Restoration costs incurred to restore property to its 8 preconstruction condition other than those already capitalized 9 and included in depreciation expenses. 10 (d) Property taxes to be paid by the utility based upon the 11 first assessment date following placement in service. 12 (2) âSystem enhancement costsâ does not include fines 13 or penalties assessed against or imposed on a utility for 14 violating laws, regulations, or consent decrees. 15 g. (1) âSystem enhancement improvementâ means a water 16 or wastewater utility plant project that does any of the 17 following: 18 (a) Installs new utility infrastructure required by 19 federal, state, or local requirements pertaining to resilience, 20 health, safety, or environmental protection. 21 (b) Relocates utility infrastructure necessary to 22 accommodate public improvement projects required by federal, 23 state, or local jurisdictions to the extent the relocation 24 costs are not otherwise reimbursed through the public 25 improvement project. 26 (2) âSystem enhancement improvementâ does not include a 27 water or wastewater utility plant included in the eligible 28 utilityâs rate base in its most recent general rate case. 29 3. a. Before an eligible utility may seek recovery of 30 its service enhancement costs through a system enhancement 31 charge under this section, it must first obtain approval 32 from the commission of a plan including the proposed service 33 enhancement improvement. The eligible utility must file with 34 the commission an application and supporting evidence for the 35 -2- LSB 5582HV (3) 91 sb/js 2/ 8 H.F. 2581 plan. The commission shall dismiss an application to approve 1 a plan if the commission has not issued a final order in a 2 general rate case proceeding under section 476.6 involving the 3 eligible utility for the same type of utility service within 4 the past five years. 5 b. Evidence supporting an application to approve a plan 6 shall include all of the following: 7 (1) Projected annual capital expenditures identified 8 by major categories of expenditures of service enhancement 9 improvements included in the plan. 10 (2) Estimated operation and maintenance costs resulting 11 from the service enhancement improvements. 12 (3) A description of the age, condition, or other similar 13 and reasonably available information about the existing 14 infrastructure, if applicable. 15 (4) The applicable requirements, including any consent 16 decrees and conditions, including but not limited to completion 17 deadlines related to the requirements. 18 (5) A narrative describing how the service enhancement 19 improvement enables compliance with the requirements. 20 (6) Alternative plans for compliance considered by the 21 eligible utility. 22 (7) An engineering evaluation and report identifying the 23 system enhancement improvements included in the plan, with 24 descriptions of project objectives, detailed cost estimates, 25 and the estimated in-service dates for each system enhancement 26 improvement. 27 (8) Any blanket-type work order and its associated costs 28 proposed to implement the improvement. 29 (9) Proposed rate schedules establishing a system 30 enhancement charge. 31 (10) The estimated rate impact of the proposed system 32 enhancement charge. 33 c. An application for approval of a plan shall be a 34 contested case. The commission shall issue its final order 35 -3- LSB 5582HV (3) 91 sb/js 3/ 8 H.F. 2581 on the application not more than ten months after the filing 1 of the petition. When reviewing the plan and corresponding 2 system enhancement charge, the commission shall make reasonable 3 efforts to ensure the utility is in compliance with the 4 requirements as supported by evidence in the application and 5 the proceeding. The commission may consider the following 6 criteria: 7 (1) Consists of projects that are service enhancement 8 improvements, except any removed pursuant to paragraph âdâ . 9 (2) Includes cost estimates that enable a reasonable 10 assessment of the costs of the plan. 11 (3) Will result in rates that are just and reasonable. 12 d. The commission shall not disapprove the plan on the basis 13 that one or more service enhancement improvements within the 14 plan do not satisfy paragraph âeâ . The commission may approve 15 the plan subject to the removal of the service enhancement 16 improvements found not to satisfy paragraph âeâ . 17 e. An eligible utility that operates both a water and 18 wastewater utility shall establish separate plans for water and 19 wastewater enhancement plans and such plans may be presented to 20 the commission through different petitions. 21 4. a. An eligible utility with one or more plans 22 approved under subsection 3 shall file with the commission an 23 application annually setting forth rate schedules establishing 24 a system enhancement charge, which may thereafter be 25 automatically adjusted and include a reconciliation of revenues 26 collected under previous system enhancement charges. A revenue 27 reconciliation filing will be filed on an annual basis no later 28 than ninety days following the expiration of the charge. The 29 commission shall review the filing to ensure compliance with 30 previously approved filings. 31 b. The system enhancement charge shall do all of the 32 following: 33 (1) Be calculated as a monthly fixed charge based upon meter 34 size. 35 -4- LSB 5582HV (3) 91 sb/js 4/ 8 H.F. 2581 (2) Not include recovery of any system enhancement costs 1 recovered by the eligible utility through contributions in aid 2 of construction. 3 (3) Recover system enhancement costs incurred prior to the 4 date of the petition and not previously recovered through a 5 system enhancement charge. 6 (4) Reflect system enhancement costs for system enhancement 7 improvements placed in service prior to the date the 8 application is filed. 9 c. The application filed to implement the system enhancement 10 charge shall include all of the following: 11 (1) A breakdown of costs for each service enhancement 12 improvement that clearly identifies the status of completion of 13 such project. 14 (2) The actual costs incurred, the projected construction 15 timeline for projects with a construction period of more than 16 twelve months, and the in-service or estimated in-service 17 dates or aggregate information capturing service enhancement 18 improvements constructed pursuant to blanket-type work project 19 orders and the actual annual costs of the replacement programs 20 performed pursuant to blanket-type work project orders. 21 d. The commission shall not authorize an adjustment to the 22 system enhancement charge to incorporate system enhancement 23 costs incurred since the date of prior petition filed under 24 this subsection if the commission has not issued a final order 25 in a general rate case proceeding under section 476.6 involving 26 the eligible utility within the past five years. 27 5. Publication of notice of an eligible utilityâs petitions 28 under section 476.6, subsection 2, is required. 29 6. An eligible utilityâs system enhancement charge approved 30 under this section shall reset to zero upon approval of 31 new basic rates and charges for the eligible utility by the 32 commission in a general rate case. 33 7. The commission shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A 34 to establish procedures to implement this chapter. 35 -5- LSB 5582HV (3) 91 sb/js 5/ 8 H.F. 2581